North Carolina, session 2025, HB1038.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 2-8 of the Charter of the City of Jacksonville, being Chapter
911 of the 1967 Session Laws, as amended by City Ordinance No. 89-21 adopted on April 26,
1989, and City Ordinance No. 06-59 adopted on November 21, 2006, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 2-8. – Election of mayor and council – Generally.
At a regular election to be held by the Onslow County Board of Elections on the Tuesday
after the first Monday in November, there shall be elected a mayor and six councilmembers,
Council Members, all of whom shall reside within the city and who shall run and be elected in
the following manner: Two of the councilmembers shall run at large and four of the
councilmembers shall be elected from the wards established by the City of Jacksonville under
this ordinance and map published herewith or as such wards may hereafter be constituted, and
there shall be elected only one councilmember from each ward who shall be a resident of the
ward for which he is elected and shall be voted on by the qualified voters of such ward. The
candidate receiving the highest number of votes for the office of councilmember from the ward
of his residence shall be declared elected to that office. The two candidates running at large
shall be voted on by all qualified voters of the city and the two candidates running at large who
receive the highest number of votes for the office of councilmember shall be declared elected
to that office. The candidate for mayor shall be elected by the electors of the city at large. The
candidate receiving the highest number of votes for the office of mayor shall be declared
elected mayor.
Effective December 27, 2006, at the next regular municipal election following
pre-clearance of this Charter Amendment by the Department of Justice, if said pre-clearance
occurs on or before the last day of the filing period for said election, the candidates receiving
the highest number of votes for the Office of Mayor and the candidates receiving the highest
number of votes for Ward 3 and Ward 4 (minority ward) Council Members shall be elected for
an initial four (4) year term; and the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes for
At-Large Council Members and the candidates receiving the highest number of votes for Ward
1 (minority ward) and Ward 2 Council Members shall be elected for an initial two (2) year
term. Subsequent elections for the Mayor and all City Council Members shall be for four-year
terms and until their successors are elected and qualified.at-large by the qualified voters of the
entire City of Jacksonville. The mayor shall serve a four-year term and until a successor is
elected and qualified. Council Members shall serve four-year staggered terms and until their
successors are elected and qualified."
*H1038-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act shall not affect the filling of a vacancy that occurs for the
officers in the City of Jacksonville for a seat elected prior to the effective date of this act. Any
person appointed to fill a vacancy for a Council Member seat representing a ward shall be a
resident of the ward in which the vacancy occurs.
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective at the time of the organizational
meeting held in accordance with G.S. 160A-68 in December 2027. In order to implement Section
1 of this act, the 2027 elections shall be conducted as if the provisions of this section were already
in effect. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 1038-Second Edition